Florida, session 2026, SB130.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPresent subsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 15 39.806, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3), 16 (4), and (5), respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to 17 that section, to read: 18 39.806âGrounds for termination of parental rights.â 19 (2)âA court may not deny or otherwise restrict a parentâs 20 custody of a minor child or the parentâs visitation rights or 21 parenting time with a minor child based solely on the parentâs 22 status as a qualified patient pursuant to s. 381.986. There is 23 no presumption of neglect or child endangerment based solely on 24 the parentâs status as a qualified patient pursuant to s. 25 381.986. In determining the best interests of the child with 26 respect to custody or dependency, this section applies. 27 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.